Arkansas, session 2025, HB1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101(12)(B), concerning the meaning of
recurring remuneration in the definition of "compensation" under the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The following are recurring remuneration for personal
services for the purposes of determining retirement benefits:
(i) Career service recognition payments paid to a
member under § 21-5-106;
(ii) Payments made to a member under § 21-5-1101,
including without limitation a lump-sum payment;
(iii)(a) Except as provided in subdivision
(12)(B)(iii)(b) of this section, payments made to a member under § 14-14-
1206(a), including without limitation a bonus or lump-sum payment.
(b) The maximum amount of the bonus or lump-
*LJH040*
01/23/2025 9:45:28 AM LJH040

HB1211
sum payment that will be considered to be compensation during the last year
of a member's employment is the lesser of five percent (5%) of the current
year's salary or the amount of the bonus or lump-sum payment that was
received by the member during the previous year of employment;
(iv)(a) Except as provided in subdivision
(12)(B)(iv)(b) of this section, a bonus or lump-sum payment made to a
municipal employee as provided in the municipality's annual budget under §
14-42-308.
(b) The maximum amount of the bonus or lump-
sum payment that will be considered to be compensation during the member's
last year of employment is the lesser of five percent (5%) of the current
year's salary or the amount of the bonus or lump-sum payment that was
received by the member during the previous year of employment; and
(v) Lump-sum payments made to a member under § 21-5-
211 and §21-5-219 [repealed];
(vi) Lump-sum payments made to a member under § 21-
5-227; and
(vii) Bonus payments made to a member under § 21-5-
228.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-110 is repealed.
24-4-110. Failure to terminate — Commencement of annuity payments —
Election to retire.
A retirant shall not begin receiving annuity payments until all
requirements for terminating qualified employment are satisfied.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-4-111 is repealed.
24-4-111. Failure to meet termination requirements — Member's
retirement election.
The failure to meet termination requirements does not revoke a member's
retirement election.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-4-520(d), regarding forfeiture of
benefits until termination requirements under the Arkansas Public Employees'
Retirement System are met, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) Persons failing A member or former member in the system who
01/23/2025 9:45:28 AM LJH040

HB1211
fails to meet termination requirements shall forfeit their benefits until
requirements are met.
(2) A retirant shall not begin receiving annuity payments until
all requirements for terminating qualified employment are satisfied.
(3) The failure to meet termination requirements does not revoke
a member's retirement election.






























01/23/2025 9:45:28 AM LJH040